Utah statutes.
63A-1-106.   Federal assistance -- Acceptance -- Approval of applications -- Expenditures necessary for eligibility.

(1)  The executive director with the approval of the governor may accept on behalf of the state, and bind the state by that acceptance, any fund or service, advanced, offered, or contributed in whole or in part by the federal government for purposes consistent with the powers and duties of the department.

(2)  All applications for federal grants or other federal assistance in support of any program of the department are subject to the approval of the executive director.

(3)  If any executive or legislative provisions of the federal government require the expenditure of state funds as a condition to participation by the state in any fund, property, or service, the executive director, with the governor's approval, shall expend whatever funds are necessary out of the money provided by the Legislature for use and disbursement by the department.

